Illinois, session 104th, HB1220.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Reproductive Health Act is amended by 5adding Section 1-17 as follows: 6    (775 ILCS 55/1-17 new)7    Sec. 1-17. Informed consent for abortion.8    (a) Except in the case of a medical emergency, consent to a 9termination of pregnancy is voluntary and informed only if: 10        (1) The physician who is to perform the procedure, or 11    the referring physician, has, at a minimum, orally, while 12    physically present in the same room, and at least 24 hours 13    before the procedure, informed the woman of:14            (A) The nature and risks of undergoing or not 15        undergoing the proposed procedure that a reasonable 16        patient would consider material to making a knowing 17        and willful decision of whether to terminate a 18        pregnancy.19            (B) The probable gestational age of the fetus, 20        verified by an ultrasound, at the time the termination 21        of pregnancy is to be performed.22                (i) The ultrasound must be performed by the 23            physician who is to perform the abortion or by a   HB1220- 2 -LRB104 06585 JRC 16621 b1            person having documented evidence that he or she 2            has completed a course in the operation of 3            ultrasound equipment as prescribed by rule and who 4            is working in conjunction with the physician.5                (ii) The person performing the ultrasound must 6            offer the woman the opportunity to view the live 7            ultrasound images and hear an explanation of them. 8            If the woman accepts the opportunity to view the 9            images and hear the explanation, a physician or a 10            registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, 11            advanced practice registered nurse, or physician 12            assistant working in conjunction with the 13            physician must contemporaneously review and 14            explain the images to the woman before the woman 15            gives informed consent to having an abortion 16            procedure performed. 17                (iii) The woman has a right to decline to view 18            and hear the explanation of the live ultrasound 19            images after she is informed of her right and 20            offered an opportunity to view the images and hear 21            the explanation. If the woman declines, the woman 22            shall complete a form acknowledging that she was 23            offered an opportunity to view and hear the 24            explanation of the images but that she declined 25            that opportunity. The form must also indicate that 26            the woman's decision was not based on any undue   HB1220- 3 -LRB104 06585 JRC 16621 b1            influence from any person to discourage her from 2            viewing the images or hearing the explanation and 3            that she declined of her own free will. 4                (iv) Unless requested by the woman, the person 5            performing the ultrasound may not offer the 6            opportunity to view the images and hear the 7            explanation and the explanation may not be given 8            if, at the time the woman schedules or arrives for 9            her appointment to obtain an abortion, a copy of a 10            restraining order, police report, medical record, 11            or other court order or documentation is presented 12            which provides evidence that the woman is 13            obtaining the abortion because the woman is a 14            victim of rape, incest, domestic violence, or 15            human trafficking or that the woman has been 16            diagnosed as having a condition that, on the basis 17            of a physician's good faith clinical judgment, 18            would create a serious risk of substantial and 19            irreversible impairment of a major bodily function 20            if the woman delayed terminating her pregnancy. 21            (C) The medical risks to the woman and fetus of 22        carrying the pregnancy to term.23        The physician may provide the information required in 24    this paragraph within 24 hours before the procedure if 25    requested by the woman at the time she schedules or 26    arrives for her appointment to obtain an abortion and if   HB1220- 4 -LRB104 06585 JRC 16621 b1    she presents to the physician a copy of a restraining 2    order, police report, medical record, or other court order 3    or documentation evidencing that she is obtaining the 4    abortion because she is a victim of rape, incest, domestic 5    violence, or human trafficking. 6        (2) Printed materials prepared and provided by the 7    Department have been provided to the pregnant woman, if 8    she chooses to view these materials, including:9            (A) A description of the fetus, including a 10        description of the various stages of development. 11            (B) A list of entities that offer alternatives to 12        terminating the pregnancy. 13            (C) Detailed information on the availability of 14        medical assistance benefits for prenatal care, 15        childbirth, and neonatal care. 16        (3) The woman acknowledges in writing, before the 17    termination of pregnancy, that the information required to 18    be provided under this subsection has been provided. 19    Nothing in this Section is intended to prohibit a 20physician from providing any additional information which the 21physician deems material to the woman's informed decision to 22terminate her pregnancy. 23    (b) If a medical emergency exists and a physician cannot 24comply with the requirements for informed consent, a physician 25may terminate a pregnancy if he or she has obtained at least 26one corroborative medical opinion attesting to the medical   HB1220- 5 -LRB104 06585 JRC 16621 b1necessity for emergency medical procedures and to the fact 2that to a reasonable degree of medical certainty the 3continuation of the pregnancy would threaten the life of the 4pregnant woman. If a second physician is not available for a 5corroborating opinion, the physician may proceed but shall 6document reasons for the medical necessity in the patient's 7medical records. 8    (c) A physician who violates this Section shall be subject 9to appropriate disciplinary action under the Medical Practice 10Act of 1987. Any other person who violates this Section shall 11be subject to appropriate disciplinary action by the 12appropriate licensing or certifying body.